Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.343.680

New second-class districts—Number and terms of directors.

Upon the establishment of a new school district of the second class, the directors of the old school districts who reside within the limits of the new district shall meet at the call of the educational service district superintendent and shall constitute the board of directors of the new district. If fewer than five such directors reside in any such new second-class school district, they shall become directors of said district, and the educational service district board shall appoint the number of additional directors required to constitute a board of five directors for the new second-class district. Vacancies once such a board has been reconstituted shall not be filled unless the number of remaining board members is less than five in a second-class district, and such vacancies shall be filled in the manner otherwise provided by law.

Each board of directors so constituted shall proceed at once to organize in the manner prescribed by law and thereafter shall have all the powers and authority conferred by law upon boards of directors of other districts of the same class. Each initial director shall hold office until his or her successor is elected and qualified: PROVIDED, That the election of the successor shall be held during the second district general election after the initial directors have assumed office. At such election, no more than five directors shall be elected either at large or by director districts, as the case may be, two for a term of two years and three for a term of four years. Directors thereafter elected and qualified shall serve such terms as provided for in *RCW 28A.315.450.

[ 1990 c 33 s 316; 1980 c 35 s 2; 1979 ex.s. c 126 s 5; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 15 s 5. Prior: 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 101; 1975 c 43 s 7; 1971 c 67 s 1; 1969 ex.s. c 176 s 137; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.57.328; prior: 1959 c 268 s 7, part; 1947 c 266 s 24, part; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 4693-43, part. Formerly RCW 28A.315.550, 28A.57.328, 28.57.350, part.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 28A.315.450 was recodified as RCW 28A.343.300 pursuant to 1999 c 315 s 804.

Severability—1980 c 35: See note following RCW 28A.343.300.

Purpose—1979 ex.s. c 126: See RCW 29A.60.280(1).

Effective date—Severability—1975 c 43: See notes following RCW 28A.535.050.

Rights preserved—Severability—1969 ex.s. c 176: See notes following RCW 28A.310.010.